District of Columbia statutes.
47-1818.08

Delegation of authority.

The Mayor may delegate the functions vested in him by this subchapter to an appropriate executive office, agency or department.

Oct. 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-174, § 2, 59 DCR 8712

History